Massachusetts, session 194th, H3419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding a new section 12VVV as 
follows:– 
Section 12VVV. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the 9th 
day in August as Indigenous Peoples Day and recommending that it be observed by the people, 
with appropriate exercises in the schools and otherwise.